en: Canned bamboo shoots, Canned drained bamboo shoots
fr: Pousses de bambou en conserve, Pousses de bambou appertisées égouttées
hr: Konzervirane ocijeđene mladice bambusa
nl: Bamboekiemen in blik

en: Raw bamboo shoots
fr: Pousses de bambou crues
hr: Sirove mladice bambusa
nl: Bamboekiemen (rauw)

en: Dried bamboo shoots
fr: Pousses de bambou séchées

en: sprouted wheat
fr: Blé germé

en: Lentil sprouts, Sprouted lentils
es: Germinados de lentejas
fr: Lentilles germées
hr: Klice leće
nl: Linzenkiemen
pl: Kiełki soczewicy

en: Fresh lentil sprouts
es: Germinados de lentejas frescos, Brotes de lentejas frescos
fr: Lentilles germées fraîches, pousses de lentilles fraîches
hr: Svježe klice leće
pl: Świeże kiełki soczewicy

en: Canned sprouts, Canned germinated seeds
de: Keime in Dosen
es: Germinados en conserva, Semillas germinadas en conserva, Brotes en conserva
fi: purkitettuja ituja
fr: Pousses en conserve, Graines germées en conserve
hr: Konzervirane klice
it: Germogli in scatola
nl: Kiemen in pot

en: Purées, Mashes, Mash
bg: Пюре
de: Pürees, Breie
es: Puré
fi: Soseet, Pyreet, pureet, Muusit
fr: Purées
hr: Pirei
it: Puré
ja: ピュレ, ピューレ
nl: Puree, Moes
ru: Пюре
zh: 泥状食品

en: Prepared potatoes
da: Tilberedte kartofler
fr: Pommes de terre préparées
hr: Pripremljeni krumpir
nl: Geprepareerde aardappelen

en: Precooked potatoes
da: Forkogte karofler
fr: Pommes de terres précuites
hr: Prethodno kuhani krumpir
nl: Voorgekookte aardappelen

en: Cooked potatoes, Boiled potatoes
da: Kogte kartofler
fr: Pommes de terre cuites
hr: Kuhani krumpir
nl: Gekookte aardappelen

en: Boiled or steamed potatoes, Potatoes cooked in water or steam
da: Kogte eller dampede kartofler
fr: Pommes de terre bouillies ou à la vapeur, Pommes de terre cuites à l'eau ou à la vapeur

en: Steamed potatoes, steamed cooked potatoes
da: Dampkogte kartofler
fr: Pommes de terre cuites à la vapeur, Pommes de terre à la vapeur

en: Boiled peeled ware potatoes, Peeled ware potatoes cooked in water
fr: Pommes de terre de conservation sans peau bouillies, Pommes de terre de conservation sans peau cuites à l'eau

en: Baked peeled potatoes
da: Bagte skrællede kartofler
fr: Pommes de terre sans peau cuites au four

en: Roasted potatoes, Baked potatoes
da: Stegte kartofler, Bagte kartofler
fr: Pommes de terre rôties, Pommes de terre cuites au four

en: Sautéed Potatoes, Pan-fried potatoes
da: Sauterede kartofler, Pandestegte kartofler
fr: Pommes de terre sautées, Pommes de terre poêlées

en: Fried potato cubes
da: Ristede kartoffeltern
fr: Pommes de terre rissolées

en: Sautéed potato with goose fat, Pan-fried potato with goose fat
fr: Pommes de terre sautées à la graisse de canard, Pommes de terre poêlées à la graisse de canard

en: Vacuum-packed steamed potatoes
da: Vakuumpakkede dampede kartofler
fr: Pommes de terre vapeur sous vide